District of Columbia statutes.
15-361

Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act of 2011”.

Feb. 24, 2012, D.C. Law 19-86, § 2(b), 58 DCR 11186
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1 of the Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act.